test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AD_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲alad - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AD_STEM_1

     sg̲alad+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲alad
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲aladáa
     sg̲alad+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲aladáan
     sg̲alad+V+RELATIVE: sg̲alads
     sg̲alad+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲aladáas
     sg̲alad+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲aladáa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲aladäsáa
     sg̲alad+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲aladäs
     sg̲alad+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲aladäsáang
     sg̲alad+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲aladäsga
     sg̲alad+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲aladäsáas
     sg̲alad+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲aladäsáa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'úuj
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'úujang
     sg̲alad+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲aladäsáa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'us
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'ujáa
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áujaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲aladäsáa'us
     sg̲alad+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲aladäsáa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲aladäséehl
     sg̲alad+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲alad'úu
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'wägán
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áawaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'áawaan
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'wáas
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲alad'áawaas
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'áawaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'wägíinii
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'wägáangaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'wägáangaan
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲alad'wáaäsaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲alad'wáaäs
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáaäsaang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáaäsga
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáaäsaas
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'wáaäsaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa'uuj
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲alad'wáaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa'us
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'wáa'ujaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'wáa'uujaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáaäsaa'us
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲alad'wáa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲alad'wáa'ahlanggan
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'wáa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áawaa'ahlang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲alad'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲alad'wáa'ahl
     sg̲alad+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲alad'wáaäseehl
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sg̲alad'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'ángga
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'ánggan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áangaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'áangaan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'áns
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲alad'áangaas
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'angáng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'áangaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'ánggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'ánggaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'ánggaangaan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲alad'ángäsaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲alad'ángäs
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'ángäsaang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'ángäsga
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'ángäsaas
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'ángäsaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'uuj
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲alad'ángäsaa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'us
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'ujaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'uujaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'ángäsaa'us
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áang'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲alad'áang'ahlanggan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áang'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲alad'ángäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'áang'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áangaa'ahlang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲alad'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áangaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sg̲alad'áang'ahl
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲alad'ángäseehl
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sg̲alad'áng'uu
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'wägan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'aawaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'aawaan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waas
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sg̲alad'áng'aawaas
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'áng'aawaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'wägiinii
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'wägaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'wägaangaan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sg̲alad'áng'waaäs
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsga
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaas
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sg̲alad'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa'uuj
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa'us
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ujaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaa'us
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ahlans
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sg̲alad'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sg̲alad'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sg̲alad'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waa'ahl
     sg̲alad+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sg̲alad'áng'waaäseehl
